src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/Num-Oct_2016_gt-desc.yaml
  Numerals:
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Par: kahtesid
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: kahtesidki
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Par: kahte
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: kahtegi
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Par+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: kahtki
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Par+Usage/Rare: kaht
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Ill: kahte
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: kahtegi
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Ill+Usage/Hyp: kahesse
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Hyp: kahessegi
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Nom: kahed
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: kahedki
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Com: kahega
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: kahegagi
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Abe: kaheta
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: kahetagi
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Ess: kahena
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: kahenagi
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Trm: kaheni
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: kahenigi
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Tra: kaheks
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: kahekski
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Abl: kahelt
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: kaheltki
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Ade: kahel
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: kahelgi
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+All: kahele
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+All+Foc/gi: kahelegi
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Ela: kahest
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: kahestki
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Ine: kahes
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: kaheski
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Gen: kahe
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: kahegi
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Ill: kahtedesse
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: kahtedessegi
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Com: kahtedega
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: kahtedegagi
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Abe: kahtedeta
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: kahtedetagi
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Ess: kahtedena
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: kahtedenagi
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Trm: kahtedeni
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: kahtedenigi
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Tra: kahtedeks
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: kahtedekski
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Abl: kahtedelt
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: kahtedeltki
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Ade: kahtedel
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: kahtedelgi
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+All: kahtedele
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+All+Foc/gi: kahtedelegi
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Ela: kahtedest
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: kahtedestki
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Ine: kahtedes
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: kahtedeski
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Gen: kahtede
      kaks+Num+Card+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: kahtedegi
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Nom: kaks
      kaks+Num+Card+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: kakski
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Nom: sajad
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: sajadki
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Ill: sajasse
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: sajassegi
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Com: sajaga
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: sajagagi
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Abe: sajata
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: sajatagi
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Ess: sajana
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: sajanagi
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Trm: sajani
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: sajanigi
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Tra: sajaks
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: sajakski
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Abl: sajalt
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: sajaltki
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Ade: sajal
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: sajalgi
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+All: sajale
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+All+Foc/gi: sajalegi
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Ela: sajast
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: sajastki
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Ine: sajas
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: sajaski
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Gen: saja
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: sajagi
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Par+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: sadasidki
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Par+Usage/Rare: sadasid
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Par: sada
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: sadagi
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Nom: sada
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: sadagi
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Par+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: sadatki
      sada+Num+Card+Sg+Par+Usage/Rare: sadat
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Ill: sadadesse
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: sadadessegi
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Com: sadadega
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: sadadegagi
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Abe: sadadeta
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: sadadetagi
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Ess: sadadena
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: sadadenagi
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Trm: sadadeni
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: sadadenigi
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Tra: sadadeks
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: sadadekski
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Abl: sadadelt
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: sadadeltki
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Ade: sadadel
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: sadadelgi
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+All: sadadele
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+All+Foc/gi: sadadelegi
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Ela: sadadest
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: sadadestki
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Ine: sadades
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: sadadeski
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Gen: sadade
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: sadadegi
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Par: sadu
      sada+Num+Card+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: sadugi
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Nom: sajandad
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: sajandadki
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Par: sajandaid
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: sajandaidki
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Ill: sajandasse
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: sajandassegi
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Com: sajandaga
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: sajandagagi
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Abe: sajandata
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: sajandatagi
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Ess: sajandana
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: sajandanagi
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Trm: sajandani
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: sajandanigi
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Tra: sajandaks
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: sajandakski
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Abl: sajandalt
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: sajandaltki
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Ade: sajandal
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: sajandalgi
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+All: sajandale
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+All+Foc/gi: sajandalegi
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Ela: sajandast
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: sajandastki
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Ine: sajandas
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: sajandaski
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Gen: sajanda
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: sajandagi
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Par: sajandat
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: sajandatki
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Ill+Usage/Rare: sajandaisse
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: sajandaissegi
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Tra+Usage/Rare: sajandaiks
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: sajandaikski
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Abl+Usage/Rare: sajandailt
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: sajandailtki
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: sajandail
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: sajandailgi
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+All+Usage/Rare: sajandaile
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: sajandailegi
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Ela+Usage/Rare: sajandaist
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: sajandaistki
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Ine+Usage/Rare: sajandais
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: sajandaiski
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Ill: sajandatesse
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: sajandatessegi
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Com: sajandatega
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: sajandategagi
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Abe: sajandateta
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: sajandatetagi
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Ess: sajandatena
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: sajandatenagi
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Trm: sajandateni
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: sajandatenigi
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Tra: sajandateks
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: sajandatekski
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Abl: sajandatelt
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: sajandateltki
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Ade: sajandatel
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: sajandatelgi
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+All: sajandatele
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+All+Foc/gi: sajandatelegi
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Ela: sajandatest
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: sajandatestki
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Ine: sajandates
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: sajandateski
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Gen: sajandate
      sajas+Num+Ord+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: sajandategi
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom: sajas
      sajas+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: sajaski
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom: teine
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: teinegi
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Par: teisi
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: teisigi
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Par: teist
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: teistki
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Ill: teise
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: teisegi
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: teisessegi
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Ill+Usage/Rare: teisesse
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Nom: teised
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: teisedki
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Com: teisega
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: teisegagi
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Abe: teiseta
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: teisetagi
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Ess: teisena
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: teisenagi
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Trm: teiseni
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: teisenigi
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Tra: teiseks
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: teisekski
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Abl: teiselt
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: teiseltki
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Ade: teisel
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: teiselgi
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+All: teisele
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+All+Foc/gi: teiselegi
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Ela: teisest
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: teisestki
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Ine: teises
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: teiseski
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Gen: teise
      teine+Num+Ord+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: teisegi
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Ill+Usage/Rare: teisisse
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: teisissegi
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Tra+Usage/Rare: teisiks
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: teisikski
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Abl+Usage/Rare: teisilt
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: teisiltki
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: teisil
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: teisilgi
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+All+Usage/Rare: teisile
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: teisilegi
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Ela+Usage/Rare: teisist
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: teisistki
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Ine+Usage/Rare: teisis
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: teisiski
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Ill: teistesse
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: teistessegi
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Com: teistega
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: teistegagi
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Abe: teisteta
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: teistetagi
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Ess: teistena
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: teistenagi
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Trm: teisteni
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: teistenigi
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Tra: teisteks
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: teistekski
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Abl: teistelt
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: teisteltki
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Ade: teistel
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: teistelgi
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+All: teistele
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+All+Foc/gi: teistelegi
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Ela: teistest
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: teistestki
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Ine: teistes
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: teisteski
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Gen: teiste
      teine+Num+Ord+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: teistegi
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Nom: tuhanded
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: tuhandedki
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Par: tuhandeid
      tuhat+Num+Card+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: tuhandeidki
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Ill: tuhandesse
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: tuhandessegi
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Com: tuhandega
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: tuhandegagi
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Abe: tuhandeta
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: tuhandetagi
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Ess: tuhandena
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: tuhandenagi
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Trm: tuhandeni
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: tuhandenigi
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Tra: tuhandeks
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: tuhandekski
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Abl: tuhandelt
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: tuhandeltki
      tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Ade: tuhandel
